Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1546
Clerk of court; amercement; causes; procedure.

If any clerk of the court shall neglect or refuse, on demand made by the persons entitled thereto, his agent, or attorney of record, to pay over all money by him received, in his official capacity, for the use of such person, every such clerk may be amerced; and the proceedings against him and his sureties shall be the same as provided for in section 25-1545 against sheriffs and their sureties.

R.S.1867, Code § 514, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 8093;

C.S.1922, § 9029;

C.S.1929, § 20-1547;

R.S.1943, § 25-1546.

Receipt of money by clerk is an official act. Moore v. Boyer, 52 Neb. 446, 72 N.W. 586 (1897); McDonald v. Atkins, 13 Neb. 568, 14 N.W. 532 (1882).